Utah statutes.
75-3-910.   Purchasers from distributees protected.
If property distributed in kind or a security interest therein is acquired for
value in good faith and without notice of any adverse claim by a purchaser
from or lender to a distributee who has received an instrument or deed of
distribution from the personal representative, or is so acquired by a
purchaser from or lender to a transferee from the distributee, the purchaser
or lender takes title free of rights of any interested person in the estate
and incurs no personal liability to the estate, or to any interested person,
whether or not the distribution was proper or supported by court order or the
authority of the personal representative was terminated before execution of
the instrument or deed. This section protects a purchaser from or lender to a
distributee who, as personal representative, has executed a deed of
distribution to himself, as well as a purchaser from or lender to any other
distributee or his transferee. To be protected under this section, a purchaser
or lender need not inquire whether a personal representative acted properly in
making the distribution in kind, even if the personal representative and the
distributee are the same person, or whether the authority of the personal
representative had terminated before the distribution.
